Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,133
Insurer; failure to make report or provide information; penalty.

Any insurer who fails or neglects to make a report to or provide such information as requested by the department pursuant to section 38-1,129 or 38-1,130 within thirty days after the violation, action, event, or request is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Any insurer who violates this section a second or subsequent time is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1982, LB 421, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 135;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,201;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 133.